Utah statutes.
59-7-103.   Chapter applicable to receivers, trustees in bankruptcy and assignees.

Unless otherwise provided in this chapter, receivers, trustees in bankruptcy, and assignees for creditors required to make returns under this chapter shall be subject to the provisions of this chapter.

